Utah statutes.
26-18-2.4.   Medicaid drug program -- Preferred drug list.
(1)  A Medicaid drug program developed by the department under Subsection
26-18-2.3 (2)(f):
(a)  shall, notwithstanding Subsection 26-18-2.3(1)(b), be based on clinical
and cost-related factors which include medical necessity as determined by a
provider in accordance with administrative rules established by the Drug
Utilization Review Board;
(b)  may include therapeutic categories of drugs that may be exempted from the
drug program;
(c)  may include placing some drugs, except the drugs described in Subsection
(2), on a preferred drug list to the extent determined appropriate by the
department;
(d)  notwithstanding the requirements of Part 2, Drug Utilization Review
Board, shall immediately implement the prior authorization requirements for a
non-preferred drug that is in the same therapeutic class as a drug that is:
(i)  on the preferred drug list on the date that this act takes effect; or
(ii)  added to the preferred drug list after this act takes effect; and
(e)  except as prohibited by Subsections 58-17b-606(4) and (5), the prior
authorization requirements established under Subsections (1)(c) and (d) shall
permit a health care provider or the health care provider's agent to obtain a
prior authorization override of the preferred drug list through the
department's pharmacy prior authorization review process, which shall:
(i)  provide either telephone or fax approval or denial of the request within
24 hours of the receipt of a request that is submitted during normal business
hours of Monday through Friday from 8 am to 5 pm;
(ii)  provide for the dispensing of a limited supply of a requested drug as
determined appropriate by the department in an emergency situation, if the
request for an override is received outside of the department's normal
business hours; and
(iii)  require the health care provider to provide the department with
documentation of the medical need for the preferred drug list override in
accordance with criteria established by the department in consultation with
the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee.
(2) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), "immunosuppressive drug":
(i)  means a drug that is used in immunosuppressive therapy to inhibit or
prevent activity of the immune system to aid the body in preventing the
rejection of transplanted organs and tissue; and
(ii)  does not include drugs used for the treatment of autoimmune disease or
diseases that are most likely of autoimmune origin.
(b)  A preferred drug list developed under the provisions of this section may
not include:
(i)  a psychotropic or anti-psychotic drug; or
(ii)  an immunosuppressive drug.
(c)  The state Medicaid program shall reimburse for a prescription for an
immunosuppressive drug as written by the health care provider for a patient
who has undergone an organ transplant.  For purposes of Subsection
58-17b-606(4), and with respect to patients who have undergone an organ
transplant, the prescription for a particular immunosuppressive drug as
written by a health care provider meets the criteria of demonstrating to the
Department of Health a medical necessity for dispensing the prescribed
immunosuppressive drug.
(d)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Part 2, Drug Utilization Review
Board, the state Medicaid drug program may not require the use of step therapy
for immunosuppressive drugs without the written or oral consent of the health
care provider and the patient.
(3)  The department shall report to the Health and Human Services Interim
Committee and to the Health and Human Services Appropriations Subcommittee
prior to November 1, 2010 regarding the savings to the Medicaid program
resulting from the use of the preferred drug list permitted by Subsection (1).
